Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 3 State Defense Force

38-2-50.
Creation or disbandment; organization and administration; commander.

The State Defense Force may be created, established, maintained, or disbanded by the Governor at any time when such action is authorized under federal law. It shall be organized, armed, equipped, disciplined, governed, administered, and trained as prescribed by this chapter and the regulations issued thereunder, in conformance with the laws of the United States. Whenever such a state force shall be organized, it shall be commanded by a brigadier general.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 91, § 1; Code 1933, § 86-1501; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 27; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, §§ 30, 55; Ga. L. 1985, p. 356, § 4.

Cross references.

Workers’ Compensation applicability to the Georgia National Guard and the State Defense Force, §

34-9-1

.

38-2-51.
Authority of Governor.

In order to conform the organization of the State Defense Force to the organization of such state military forces as may be prescribed by the laws of the United States and regulations issued thereunder, the Governor may organize, activate, increase, change, divide, consolidate, disband, reactivate, or reorganize any unit, headquarters, staff, or cadre of the State Defense Force and may prescribe the composition and types of units, the type of organization, and the system of drill or instruction to be used in training such units.

For the purposes set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, the Governor is authorized to fix, increase, or decrease the strength of any unit, headquarters, staff, or cadre of the State Defense Force, including the number of commissioned officers, warrant officers, noncommissioned officers, and other enlisted personnel of any grade in any such unit, headquarters, staff, or cadre, and to alter the grades of officers, warrant officers, and noncommissioned officers.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 91, § 2; Code 1933, § 86-1502; Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 27; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 56; Ga. L. 1985, p. 356, § 5.

Cross references.

Georgia Military Pension Fund, T. 47, C. 24, A. 1.

38-2-52.
Detail of officers from retired and reserve lists and National Guard to State Defense Force.

Upon the recommendation of the adjutant general, the Governor may order any officer on the state reserve list or on the state retired list to active duty with the State Defense Force, in which case the officer shall rank in his grade from the date of the order. The officer may be relieved from active duty and may be returned to the reserve list or retired list in the discretion of the Governor.

Upon the recommendation of the adjutant general, the Governor may detail in his grade any commissioned or warrant officer in the Georgia National Guard, in addition to his other duties, to duty with the State Defense Force or any unit, headquarters, staff, or cadre thereof; and the officer may be relieved from such detail in the discretion of the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 28; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 57; Ga. L. 1985, p. 356, § 6.

38-2-53.
Detail of National Guard enlisted personnel to State Defense Force.

Enlisted persons of the Georgia National Guard may be detailed by the adjutant general to duty with the State Defense Force or any unit, headquarters, staff, or cadre thereof; and such persons may be relieved from such detail in the discretion of the adjutant general.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, § 29; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 58; Ga. L. 1985, p. 356, § 7.

38-2-54.
Duties, privileges, and immunities.

All duties imposed by the military law or other statutes of the state or by regulations issued thereunder upon units, commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel of the organized militia are imposed upon the units, commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel, respectively, of the State Defense Force. All rights, privileges, and immunities conferred by the military law or other statutes of the state or by regulations issued thereunder upon the units, commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel of the Georgia National Guard or of the organized militia are conferred upon the units, commissioned officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel, respectively, of the State Defense Force except as otherwise prescribed in this chapter. Such rights, privileges, and immunities include relief from civil or criminal liability for acts done while on duty; rights to pay, allowances, and other compensation; expenses and subsistence; arms, uniforms, and equipment; provision, maintenance, use, and control of armories; eligibility to appointment on the military staff of the Governor; exemption from civil process and from jury duty; right of way; right to wear the uniform and to parade with firearms; and all other rights, privileges, and immunities created by statute or custom not hereinbefore specifically enumerated.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 311, §§ 34, 38, 39, 42; Ga. L. 1955, p. 10, § 59; Ga. L. 1985, p. 356, § 8; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1160, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 287, § 1/SB 69.

Cross references.

Privilege from arrest of active duty military personnel, §

17-4-2

.

Rights and privileges of members of organized militia, §

38-2-270

et seq.

38-2-55.
Use and operation of state property.

Serving members of the State Defense Force are authorized to use and operate state property of the Georgia Department of Defense and other state agencies, including without limitation vehicles, as may be necessary for the accomplishment of training and fulfillment of assigned missions; provided, however, that the use of such property shall not be allowed if such use will interfere with the function and training of the National Guard or any state agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-55

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 606, § 1.